Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 1. Urban Renewal.
§ 43-35-23.
Bonds as legal investments.

All banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking or investment business; all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and all executors, administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a municipality pursuant to this article or by any urban renewal agency or housing authority vested with urban renewal project powers under Section 43-35-31. Such bonds and other obligations shall be secured by an agreement between the issuer and the federal government in which the issuer agrees to borrow from the federal government and the federal government agrees to lend to the issuer, prior to the maturity of such bonds or other obligations, moneys in an amount which (together with any other moneys irrevocably committed to the payment of interest on such bonds or other obligations) will suffice to pay the principal of such bonds or other obligations with interest to maturity thereon, which moneys, under the terms of said agreement, are required to be used for the purpose of paying the principal of and the interest on such bonds or other obligations at their maturity. Such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits. It is the purpose of this section to authorize any persons, political subdivisions and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations. Nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7342-11; Laws, 1958, ch. 518, § 11.

§ 43-35-25.
Property exempt from taxes and from levy and sale by virtue of an execution.

All property of a municipality including funds, owned or held by it for the purposes of this article shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same nor shall judgment against a municipality be a charge or lien upon such property. The provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given pursuant to this article by a municipality on its rents, fees, grants or revenues from urban renewal projects.

The property of a municipality, acquired or held for the purposes of this article, is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and such property shall be exempt from all taxes of the municipality, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof. Such tax exemption shall terminate when the municipality sells, leases or otherwise disposes of such property in an urban renewal area to a purchaser or lessee which is not a public body entitled to tax exemption with respect to such property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7342-12; Laws, 1958, ch. 518, § 12.

§ 43-35-27.
Cooperation by public bodies.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any public body may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine: (1) dedicate, sell, convey or lease any of its interest in any property or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges therein to a municipality; (2) incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by such public body in exercising the powers granted in this section; (3) do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or carrying out of an urban renewal plan; (4) lend, grant or contribute funds to a municipality; (5) enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary) with a municipality or other public body respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this article, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with an urban renewal project; and (6) cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake to be furnished; furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways or other places; plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of the public body or make exceptions from building regulations; and cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the municipality. If at any time title to or possession of any urban renewal project is held by any public body or governmental agency, other than the municipality, which is authorized by law to engage in the undertaking, carrying out, or administration of urban renewal projects (including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America), the provisions of the agreements referred to in this section shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such public body or governmental agency. As used in this subsection, the term “municipality” shall also include an urban renewal agency or a housing authority vested with all of the urban renewal project powers pursuant to the provisions of Section 43-35-31.

Any sale, conveyance, lease or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement or public bidding.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project of an urban renewal agency or a housing authority hereunder, a municipality may (in addition to its other powers and upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine) do and perform any or all of the actions or things which, by the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a public body is authorized to do or perform, including the furnishing of financial and other assistance.

For the purposes of this section, or for the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project of a municipality, such municipality may (in addition to any authority to issue bonds pursuant to Section 43-35-21) issue and sell its general obligation bonds. Any bonds issued by a municipality pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the laws of this state for the issuance and authorization of bonds by such municipality for public purposes generally.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7342-13; Laws, 1958, ch. 518, § 13.

§ 43-35-29.
Title of purchaser.

Any instrument executed by a municipality and purporting to convey any right, title or interest in any property under this article shall be conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with the provisions of this article in so far as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees or transferees of such property is concerned.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7342-14; Laws, 1958, ch. 518, § 14.

§ 43-35-31.
Exercise of powers in carrying out urban renewal project.

A municipality may itself exercise its urban renewal project powers (as herein defined) or may, if the local governing body by resolution determines such action to be in the public interest, elect to have such powers exercised by the urban renewal agency (created by Section 43-35-33) or by the housing authority, if one exists or is subsequently established in the community. In the event the local governing body makes such determination, the urban renewal agency or the housing authority, as the case may be, shall be vested with all of the urban renewal project powers in the same manner as though all such powers were conferred on such agency or authority instead of the municipality. If the local governing body does not elect to make such determination, the municipality, in its discretion, may exercise its urban renewal project powers through a board or commissioner or through such officers of the municipality as the local governing body may by resolution determine.

As used in this section, the term “urban renewal project powers” shall include the rights, powers, functions and duties of a municipality under this article, except the following: the power to determine an area to be a slum or blighted area or combination thereof and to designate such area as appropriate for an urban renewal project and to hold any public hearings required with respect thereto; the power to approve urban renewal plans and modifications thereof; the power to establish a general plan for the locality as a whole; the power to formulate a workable program under Section 43-35-9; the power to make the determinations and findings provided for in Section 43-35-7, Section 43-35-11, and subsection (d) of Section 43-35-13; the power to issue general obligation bonds; and the power to appropriate funds, to levy taxes and assessments, and to exercise other powers provided for in subsection (h) of Section 43-35-15.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7342-15; Laws, 1958, ch. 518, § 15.

§ 43-35-33.
Urban renewal agency.

There is hereby created in each municipality a public body corporate and politic to be known as the “urban renewal agency” of the municipality. Such agency shall not transact any business or exercise its powers hereunder until or unless the local governing body has made the finding prescribed in Section 43-35-11, and has elected to have the urban renewal project powers exercised by an urban renewal agency as provided in Section 43-35-31.

If the urban renewal agency is authorized to transact business and exercise powers hereunder, the mayor, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency which shall consist of five (5) commissioners. The term of office of each such commissioner shall be for five (5) years. The commissioners who are appointed in 1973 shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, respectively, from the date of their appointment, and thereafter when a vacancy shall occur either by the expiration of term of office or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled by the governing body of the city either to fill an unexpired term where a commissioner shall die or resign or shall become disqualified during his term, or for a full term of five (5) years where the term of a commissioner expires.

A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.

The powers of an urban renewal agency shall be exercised by the commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the powers of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws shall require a larger number. Any persons may be appointed as commissioners if they reside within the area of operation of the agency, which shall be coterminous with the area of operation of the municipality, and are otherwise eligible for such appointments under this article.

An agency may employ an executive director, technical experts and such other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. For such legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or retain its own counsel and legal staff. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this article shall file with the local governing body, on or before March 31 of each year, a report of its activities for its preceding fiscal year, which report shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income and operating expenses as of the end of such fiscal year. At the time of filing the report, the agency shall publish a true and correct copy of such report in a newspaper of general circulation in the community.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed only after a hearing and after he shall have been given a copy of the charges at least ten (10) days prior to such hearing and have had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7342-16; Laws, 1958, ch. 518, § 6; Laws, 1973, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 371, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1985).

§ 43-35-35.
Interested public officials, commissioners or employees.

No public official or employee of a municipality, or of any board or commission thereof who exercises any authority with respect to urban renewal projects undertaken pursuant to this article, and no commissioner or employee of a housing authority or urban renewal agency which has been vested by a municipality with urban renewal project powers under Section 43-35-31 shall voluntarily acquire any personal interest, direct or indirect, in any urban renewal project, or in any property included or planned to be included in any urban renewal project of such municipality or in any contract or proposed contract in connection with such urban renewal project. Where such acquisition is not voluntary, the interest acquired shall be immediately disclosed in writing to the local governing body and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body. If any such official, commissioner or employee presently owns or controls, or owned or controlled within the preceding two (2) years, any interest, direct or indirect, in any property which he knows is included or planned to be included in an urban renewal project, he shall immediately disclose this fact in writing to the local governing body, and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body, and any such official, commissioner or employee shall not participate in any action by the municipality, or board or commission thereof, housing authority, or urban renewal agency affecting such property. Any disclosure required to be made by this section to the local governing body shall concurrently be made to a housing authority or urban renewal agency which has been vested with urban renewal project powers by the municipality pursuant to the provisions of Section 43-35-31. No commissioner or other officer of any housing authority, urban renewal agency, board or commission exercising powers pursuant to this article shall hold any other public office under the municipality other than his commissionership or office with respect to such housing authority, urban renewal agency, board or commission. Any violation of the provisions of this section shall constitute misconduct in office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7342-17; Laws, 1958, ch. 518, § 17; Laws, 1979, ch. 410, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-35-37.
Urban Renewal Law as controlling.

In so far as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling. The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to amend, repeal or supersede the provisions of the Public Utility Law of 1956, Sections 77-3-1 through 77-3-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, nor to authorize the construction or operation of utility facilities where reasonably adequate services are being provided by an existing utility. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to authorize the taking of private property for any purpose other than necessary public use.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7342-19; Laws, 1958, ch. 518, § 19.